North Carolina statutes. Chapter 147. State Officers.
Article 6. Treasurer.
§ 147-69.2.
Investments authorized for special funds held by State Treasurer.

This section applies to funds held by the State Treasurer to the credit of each of the following:

The Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System of North Carolina.

The Consolidated Judicial Retirement System of North Carolina.

The State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-55, s. 1.3, effective January 31, 2017.

The Disability Salary Continuation Income Plan of North Carolina.

The North Carolina Firefighters’ and Rescue Squad Workers’ Pension Fund.

The North Carolina Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System.

The Legislative Retirement System of North Carolina.

The Escheat Fund.

The Legislative Retirement Fund.

The State Education Assistance Authority.

The State Property Fire Insurance Fund.

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-55, s. 1.3, effective January 31, 2017.

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-55, s. 1.3, effective January 31, 2017.

The State Public Education Property Insurance Fund.

(15a)

Repealed by Session Laws 2020-69, s. 9(b), effective July 1, 2020.

The Liability Insurance Trust Fund.

(16a)

The University of North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill funds, except appropriated funds, deposited with the State Treasurer pursuant to

G.S. 116-37.2

.

Trust funds of The University of North Carolina and its constituent institutions deposited with the State Treasurer pursuant to

G.S. 116-36.1

.

(17a)

North Carolina Veterans Home Trust Fund.

(17b)

North Carolina National Guard Pension Fund.

(17c)

Retiree Health Benefit Fund.

(17d)

The Election Fund.

(17e)

The North Carolina State Lottery Fund.

(17f)

Funds deposited with the State Treasurer by public hospitals pursuant to G.S. 159-39(g).

(17g)

Funds deposited with the State Treasurer by Local Government Other Post-Employment Benefits Trusts pursuant to

G.S. 159-30.1

.

(17h)

The Local Government Law Enforcement Special Separation Allowance Fund.

(17i)

The North Carolina Conservation Easement Endowment Fund.

(17j)

The Conservation Grant Fund.

(17k)

The Wildlife Endowment Fund.

(17
l
)

The Ecosystem Restoration Fund.

(17m)

The Needs-Based Public School Capital Fund.

(17n)

The Riparian Buffer Restoration Fund.

Any other special fund created by or pursuant to law for purposes other than meeting appropriations made pursuant to the Executive Budget Act.

The Swain County Settlement Trust Fund.

Institutional funds of the colleges of the North Carolina Community College System.

The Disability Income Plan of North Carolina.

The Lumbee Tribe of North Carolina Trust Fund.

The Catawba Unit No. 1 Decommissioning Trust Fund and the Catawba Unit No. 2 Decommissioning Trust Fund established by North Carolina Municipal Power Agency Number 1, as described in G.S. 159B-18(b)(6).

It shall be the duty of the State Treasurer to invest the cash of the funds enumerated in subsection (a) of this section in excess of the amount required to meet the current needs and demands on these funds. The State Treasurer may invest the funds as provided in this subsection in the manner authorized by subsection (e) of this section. If an investment was authorized by this subsection at the time the investment was made or contractually committed to be made, then that investment shall continue to be authorized by this subsection, and none of the percentage or other limitation on investments set forth in this subsection shall be construed to require the State Treasurer to subsequently dispose of the investment or fail to honor any contractual commitments as a result of changes in market values, ratings, or other investment qualifications. For purposes of computing market values on which percentage limitations on investments in this subsection are based, all investments shall be valued as of the last date of the most recent fiscal quarter. Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the State Treasurer shall categorize investment management arrangements according to the primary investment type or primary strategy utilized under the arrangement authorized under subsection (e) of this section. No investment management arrangement may be categorized in more than one of the subdivisions of this section. The State Treasurer shall select from among the following investments subject to the following limitations and requirements:

Investments authorized by G.S. 147-69.1(c)(1)-(7).

General obligations of other states of the United States.

General obligations of cities, counties and special districts in North Carolina.

Obligations of any company, other organization or legal entity incorporated or otherwise created or located within or outside the United States, including obligations that are convertible into equity securities, if, when acquired, the obligations are within one of the four highest rating categories regardless of gradations, such as ratings beginning with “AAA,” “AA,” “A,” or either “BBB” or “Baa,” of at least one nationally recognized rating service designated by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-444, s. 2, effective October 1, 2001.

Asset-backed securities (whether considered debt or equity), if, when acquired, the obligations are within one of the four highest ratings categories regardless of gradations, such as ratings beginning with “AAA,” “AA,” “A,” or either “BBB” or “Baa,” of at least one nationally recognized rating service designated by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.

(6a)

In addition to the limitations and requirements with respect to the investments of the Retirement Systems set forth in this subsection, the State Treasurer shall select investments of the assets of the Retirement Systems such that investments made pursuant to subdivisions (b)(1) through (6) of this section shall at all times equal or exceed twenty percent (20%) of the market value of all invested assets of the Retirement Systems.

(6b)

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-55, s. 1.3, effective January 31, 2017.

(6c)

With respect to Retirement Systems’ assets referred to in subdivision (b)(8), they may be invested, within or outside the United States, in obligations, debt securities, and asset-backed securities, whether considered debt or equity, including obligations and securities convertible into other securities, that do not meet the requirements of any of subdivisions (b)(1) through (6) of this section nor subdivision (b)(7) of this section. The amount invested under this subdivision shall not exceed seven and one-half percent (7.5%) of the market value of all invested assets of the Retirement Systems.

Retirement Systems’ assets referred to in subdivision (8) of this subsection may be invested in strategies managed primarily for the purpose of owning real estate or related debt financing, excluding asset-backed financing and timberlands, located within or outside the United States. The amount invested under this subdivision shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the market value of all invested assets of the Retirement Systems.

With respect to assets of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System, the Firefighters’ and Rescue Workers’ Pension Fund, the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, the Legislative Retirement System, the North Carolina National Guard Pension Fund, the Registers of Deeds’ Supplemental Pension Fund, and the Retiree Health Benefit Fund (hereinafter referred to collectively as the Retirement Systems), they may be invested in a strategy composed primarily of equity securities traded on a public securities exchange or market organized and regulated pursuant to the laws of the jurisdiction of the exchange or market and issued by any company incorporated or otherwise created or located within or outside the United States as long as the investments meet the conditions of this subdivision. The investments authorized for the Retirement Systems under this subdivision are subject to the following limitations:

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-55, s. 1.3, effective January 31, 2017.

a1.

The aggregate amount of the investments cannot exceed sixty-five percent (65%) of the market value of all invested assets of the Retirement Systems.

The aggregate amount of the investment invested through investment companies described in sub-subdivision (e)(4)b. of this section shall not exceed eight and one-half percent (8.5%) of the market value of all invested assets of the Retirement Systems, except that the market value of group trusts and individual, common, or collective trust funds of banks and trust companies shall not be applied against this limit.

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-55, s. 1.3, effective January 31, 2017.

With respect to Retirement Systems’ assets, as defined in subdivision (b)(8) of this subsection, they may be invested in (i) a strategy composed primarily of private equity, or corporate buyout transactions, within or outside the United States or (ii) an arrangement authorized under subsection (e) of this section with the primary purpose to engage in other strategies not expressly authorized by any other subdivision of this subsection. The amount invested under this subdivision shall not exceed eight and three-quarters percent (8.75%) of the market value of all invested assets of the Retirement Systems.

(9a)

With respect to Retirement Systems’ assets, as defined in subdivision (b)(8) of this subsection, they may be invested, within or outside the United States, in obligations, debt securities, asset-backed securities, whether considered debt or equity, and other investments that are acquired by the Treasurer for the primary purpose of providing protection against risks associated with inflation, along with timberland, natural resources, commodities, infrastructure, transportation, agriculture, and other tangible and intangible real assets. The amount invested under this subdivision shall not exceed seven and one-half percent (7.5%) of the market value of all invested assets of the Retirement Systems.

Recodified as part of subdivision (b)(9) by Session Laws 2000-160, s. 2.

(10a)

With respect to Retirement Systems’ assets, as defined in subdivision (8) of this subsection, the market value of any of subdivision (6c) or (7), sub-subdivision b. of subdivision (8), or subdivision (9) or (9a) of this subsection shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the market value of all invested assets of the Retirement Systems; and the aggregate market value of all assets invested pursuant to subdivisions (6c) and (7), sub-subdivision b. of subdivision (8), and subdivisions (9) and (9a) of this subsection shall not exceed thirty-five percent (35%) of the market value of all invested assets of the Retirement Systems.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 6.3(c), effective July 1, 2013.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Escheat Fund provide a perpetual and sustainable source of funding for the purposes authorized by the State Constitution. Accordingly, the following provisions apply:

With respect to assets of the Escheat Fund, in addition to those investments authorized by subdivisions (1) through (6) of this subsection, up to ten percent (10%) of the assets may be invested in the investments authorized under subdivisions (6c) through (9a) of this subsection, notwithstanding the percentage limitations imposed on the Retirement Systems’ investments under those subdivisions, and provided that the State Treasurer may invest the assets as provided in subsection (e) of this section.

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-55, s. 1.3, effective January 31, 2017.

The State Treasurer shall invest, in addition to those investments authorized by sub-subdivision a. of this subdivision, ten percent (10%) of the net assets of the Escheat Fund as authorized under

G.S. 147-69.2

A.

(b1)

The State Treasurer shall appoint an Investment Advisory Committee, which shall consist of seven members: the State Treasurer, who shall be chairman ex officio; two members selected from among the members of the boards of trustees of the Retirement Systems; and four members selected from the general public. All appointed members must have experience in areas relevant to the administration of a large, diversified investment program, including, but not limited to, investment management, securities law, real estate development, or absolute return strategies. The State Treasurer shall also appoint a Secretary of the Investment Advisory Committee who need not be a member of the committee. Members of the committee shall receive for their services the same per diem and allowances granted to members of the State boards and commissions generally. The committee shall have advisory powers only and membership shall not be deemed a public office within the meaning of Article VI, Section 9 of the Constitution of North Carolina or

G.S. 128-1.1

.

(b2)

The State Treasurer may invest funds deposited pursuant to subdivision (a)(17f) of this section in any of the investments authorized under subdivisions (b)(1) through (6), subdivision (b)(6c), and subdivision (b)(8) of this section, notwithstanding the percentage limitations imposed on the Retirement Systems’ investments therein. The State Treasurer may require a minimum deposit, up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), and may assess reasonable fees, not to exceed 15 basis points per annum, as a condition of participation pursuant to this subsection. Funds deposited pursuant to this subsection by a hospital shall remain the funds of that hospital, and interest or other investment income earned thereon shall be prorated and credited to the contributing hospital on the basis of the amounts thereof contributed, figured according to sound accounting principles. Fees assessed by the State Treasurer may be used to defray the cost of administering investments pursuant to this subsection and expenditures authorized under this section.

(b3)

The State Treasurer may invest funds deposited pursuant to subdivision (a)(16a) of this section in any of the investments authorized under subdivisions (1) through (6), subdivision (6c) and subdivision (b)(8) of this section, notwithstanding the percentage limitations imposed on the Retirement Systems’ investments therein. The State Treasurer may require a minimum deposit, up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), and may assess reasonable fees, not to exceed 15 basis points per annum, as a condition of participation pursuant to this subsection. Funds deposited pursuant to this subsection by the University of North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill shall remain the funds of the University of North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill, and interest or other investment income earned thereon shall be prorated and credited to the University of North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill on the basis of the amounts thereof contributed, figured according to sound accounting principles. Fees assessed by the State Treasurer may be used to defray the cost of administering investments pursuant to this subsection and expenditures authorized under this section.

(b4)

In addition to the investments authorized under subdivisions (b)(1) through (6) of this section, the State Treasurer may invest funds deposited pursuant to subdivision (17g) of subsection (a) of this section in any of the investments authorized under subdivisions (b)(6c) and (b)(8) of this section, notwithstanding the percentage limitations imposed on the Retirement Systems’ investments therein. Funds deposited pursuant to this subsection by a Local Government Other Post-Employment Benefits Trust and interest or other investment income earned from those funds shall be prorated and credited to the contributing trust on the basis of the amounts contributed, figured according to sound accounting principles. For investments under subdivisions (b)(6c) and (b)(8) of this section, the State Treasurer may require a minimum deposit of up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) and may assess reasonable fees of up to 15 basis points per annum as a condition of participation pursuant to this subsection. Fees assessed by the State Treasurer may be used to defray the costs of administering the Fund and expenditures authorized under this section.

(b5)

In addition to the investments authorized under subdivisions (b)(1) through (6) of this section, the State Treasurer may invest funds deposited in the Local Government Law Enforcement Special Separation Allowance Fund in any of the investments authorized under subdivisions (b)(6c) and (b)(8) of this section, notwithstanding the percentage limitations imposed on the Retirement Systems’ investments therein. For investments from that Fund made under subdivisions (b)(6c) and (b)(8) of this section, the State Treasurer may require a minimum deposit of up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) and may assess reasonable fees of up to 15 basis points per annum as a condition of making the investment. The fee may be used to defray the costs of administering the Fund and expenditures authorized under this section.

(b6)

In addition to the investments authorized under subdivisions (b)(1) through (6) of this section, the State Treasurer may invest funds deposited in the Catawba Unit No. 1 Decommissioning Trust Fund and the Catawba Unit No. 2 Decommissioning Trust Fund in any of the investments authorized under subdivisions (b)(6c) and (b)(8) of this section, notwithstanding the percentage limitations imposed on the Retirement Systems’ investments therein. For investments from the Funds made under subdivisions (b)(6c) and (b)(8) of this section, the State Treasurer may require a minimum deposit of up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) and may assess reasonable fees of up to 15 basis points per annum as a condition of making the investment. The fee may be used to defray the costs of administering the Fund and expenditures authorized under this section.

(b7)

In addition to the investments authorized under subdivisions (b)(1) through (6) of this section, the State Treasurer may invest funds deposited in the Swain County Settlement Trust Fund in any of the investments authorized under subdivision (b)(8) of this section, notwithstanding the percentage limitations imposed on the Retirement Systems’ investments therein. For investments from that Fund made under subdivision (b)(8) of this section, the State Treasurer may require a minimum deposit of up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) and may assess reasonable fees of up to 15 basis points per annum as a condition of making the investment. The fee may be used to defray the costs of administering the Fund and expenditures authorized under this section.

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 501, s. 2.

The State Treasurer may invest funds deposited pursuant to subdivisions (17i), (17j), (17k), (17l), and (17n) of subsection (a) of this section in any of the investments authorized under subdivisions (1) through (6) and subdivision (8) of subsection (b) of this section. The State Treasurer may require a minimum deposit, up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), and may assess a reasonable fee, not to exceed 15 basis points, as a condition of participation pursuant to this subsection. Fees assessed by the State Treasurer may be used to defray the costs of administering the funds and expenditures authorized under this section. Funds deposited pursuant to this subsection shall remain the funds of the North Carolina Conservation Easement Endowment Fund, the Conservation Grant Fund, the Ecosystem Restoration Fund, the Riparian Buffer Restoration Fund, or the Wildlife Endowment Fund, as applicable, and interest or other investment income earned thereon shall be prorated and credited to the North Carolina Conservation Easement Endowment Fund, the Conservation Grant Fund, the Ecosystem Restoration Fund, the Riparian Buffer Restoration Fund, or the Wildlife Endowment Fund on the basis of the amounts contributed to the respective Funds, figured according to sound accounting principles.

Investments made pursuant to this section may be made as internally managed investments by the State Treasurer or may be made through third-party investment management arrangements, under the following conditions:

Internally managed portfolios shall be subject to industry standard portfolio guidelines developed with periodic consultation by the Investment Advisory Committee.

In assessing whether to invest directly or to utilize indirect third-party investment management arrangements, the State Treasurer shall consider all material factors he or she considers relevant to the decision consistent with the Treasurer’s fiduciary duties under

G.S. 147-69.7

, including financial, operational, and investment expertise and resources, alignment of interests and investor protections, transparency and repeatability of investment process, risk controls, and cost-effectiveness.

For any third-party investment management arrangements, the investment manager must have total assets under management of at least one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) at the inception of the investment management arrangement with the State Treasurer.

Third-party investment management arrangements may be with persons and legal entities located within or outside the United States, including through any of the following:

Contractual arrangements in which the investment manager has delegated discretion and authority to invest assets.

Investment companies as defined under United States generally accepted accounting principles as promulgated by the Financial Accounting Standards Board, including without limitation entities registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940; individual, common, or collective trust funds of banks and trust companies; limited partnerships; limited liability companies or other limited liability investment vehicles; and insurance contracts that provide for participation in individual or pooled separate accounts of insurance companies.

Any limited liability investment vehicles organized by the State Treasurer shall be deemed investment companies for the purposes of this subsection.

Investment companies shall provide annual audited financial statements to the State Treasurer, unless the State Treasurer waives the requirement after conducting a cost-benefit analysis.

In connection with any investment otherwise authorized under this section, the State Treasurer may enter into an indemnification agreement provided that, under any agreement, the liability of the State Treasurer will be limited to the amount of the State Treasurer’s contractual investment.

History.

1979, c. 467, s. 2; 1983, c. 702, ss. 1-9; 1987, c. 446, s. 1; c. 751, s. 5; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1070; 1989, c. 770, s. 54; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 813, s. 11; c. 848, s. 5; 1991, c. 542, s. 16; c. 636, s. 3; c. 749, s. 8; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 777, s. 4(i); 1995, c. 346, s. 2; c. 501, s. 2; 1997-456, s. 27; 1999-237, s. 27.16; 1999-251, s. 2; 2000-160, s. 2; 2001-444, ss. 2, 3; 2003-12, s. 2; 2004-124, s. 30.22(b); 2005-144, s. 7; 2005-201, s. 2; 2005-252, s. 1; 2005-276, s. 28.17; 2005-344, s. 10; 2005-417, s. 2; 2007-323, s. 27.7; 2007-384, ss. 2, 3, 7, 8.; 2008-13, s. 2; 2008-107, ss. 12.9(b), (c), 12.13; 2009-98, s. 1; 2009-283, s. 2; 2009-451, s. 25.2(a); 2010-175, ss. 3, 4; 2011-145, ss. 6.10(a), 8.20(c); 2011-211, s. 1; 2011-340, s. 4(a), (b); 2012-130, s. 10; 2012-142, s. 6.4; 2012-178, s. 6; 2013-284, s. 1(d); 2013-360, s. 6.3(c); 2013-398, s. 1; 2015-164, s. 3(a); 2015-241, ss. 6.3(a), 14.2; 2016-55, s. 1.3; 2017-57, s. 13A.2(b), (c); 2017-102, s. 28.1(a); 2017-125, s. 6; 2018-5, ss. 5.3(e), 13.5; 2019-162, s. 5; 2019-176, s. 3(e); 2020-69, s. 9(a), (b); 2020-78, s. 7.3(a), (b); 2021-73, ss. 1(b), 2(a).

Cross References.

As to investment of idle cash by community colleges and technical institutes, see

G.S. 115D-58.6

.

§ 147-69.2A.
Investments; special funds held by the State Treasurer.

Firm to Administer Special Fund. — Following a public procurement process, a designee of the Governor, a designee of the State Treasurer, a designee of the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and a designee of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall jointly and unanimously select a third-party professional investment management firm, subject to the rules and regulations of the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, to administer a special fund created to invest assets described in G.S. 147-69.2(b)(12)c. and select investment opportunities appropriate for receiving allocations from the Fund on the basis of potential return on investment and the risks attendant thereto. The State Treasurer shall assign professional and clerical staff to assist in the oversight of the Fund. All costs for the third-party investment management firm and the professional and clerical staff shall be borne by the Fund pursuant to G.S. 147-69.3(f). The State Treasurer shall discharge his or her duties with respect to the Fund as a fiduciary consistent with

G.S. 147-69.7

.

Organization and Reporting. — All documents of the Governor or the State Treasurer concerning the Fund are public records governed by Chapter 132 of the General Statutes and any applicable provisions of the General Statutes protecting confidential information.The State Treasurer and the Governor shall jointly develop and adopt an investment policy statement for the Fund.The State Treasurer and Governor shall jointly adopt a common policy to prevent conflicts of interests such that (i) the designees of the State Treasurer and Governor who selected the third-party investment management firm, (ii) the staff of the State Treasurer overseeing the Fund, and (iii) the third-party investment management firm’s employees selecting or overseeing Fund investments do not provide services for compensation (as an employee, consultant, or otherwise), within two years after the end of their service to the Fund, to any entity in which an investment from the Fund was made.

Types of Investments. — Assets of the Fund may be invested in those types of investments authorized for the North Carolina Retirement Systems by G.S. 147-69.2(b), notwithstanding the percentage limitations imposed on the Retirement Systems’ investments under those subdivisions.

Report on Escheat Fund Financial Status. — The State Treasurer shall engage a third-party professional consultant to conduct an assessment and projection of the financial status of the Escheat Fund. The associated costs for the services may be directly charged to the Escheat Fund. The State Treasurer shall communicate the assessment of the consultant in an annual report to the Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the chairs of the respective appropriations and appropriate substantive committees of each chamber. The annual report shall evaluate claims by owners upon the Escheat Fund, current and projected investment returns, and projected contributions to the Escheat Fund, current and projected legislative appropriations, and authorized expenses. In the report, the State Treasurer shall assess the status of utilizing the Escheat Fund as an endowment fund and shall recommend an annual amount available for the funding of scholarships, loans, and grants from the Fund. The annual report shall be presented no later than December 31 of each year.

History.

2015-241, s. 6.3(b); 2016-55, ss. 1.4(a), (b), 4.3; 2017-129, s. 10; 2021-180, s. 37.12(b).

§ 147-69.3.
Administration of State Treasurer’s investment programs.

The State Treasurer shall establish, maintain, administer, manage, and operate within the Department of State Treasurer one or more investment programs for the deposit and investment of assets pursuant to the provisions of

G.S. 147-69.1

and

G.S. 147-69.2

. Different Retirement Systems and other funds held by the State Treasurer may be invested collectively or separately in the State Treasurer’s discretion consistent with the fiduciary duties stated in

G.S. 147-69.7

.

Any official, board, commission, other public authority, local government, school administrative unit, local ABC board, or community college of the State having custody of any funds not required by law to be deposited with and invested by the State Treasurer may deposit all or any portion of those funds with the State Treasurer for investment in one of the investment programs established pursuant to this section, subject to any provisions of law with respect to eligible investments, provided that any occupational licensing board as defined in

G.S. 93B-1

may participate in one of the investment programs established pursuant to this section regardless of whether or not the funds were required by law to be deposited with and invested by the State Treasurer. In the absence of specific statutory provisions to the contrary, any of those funds may be invested in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 147-69.2

and 147-69.3. Upon request from any depositor eligible under this subsection, the State Treasurer may authorize moneys invested pursuant to this subsection to be withdrawn by warrant on the State Treasurer.

The State Treasurer’s investment programs shall be so managed that in the judgment of the State Treasurer funds may be readily converted into cash when needed.

Except as provided by G.S. 147-69.1(d), the total return earned on investments shall accrue pro rata to the fund whose assets are invested according to the formula prescribed by the State Treasurer with the approval of the Governor and Council of State.

The State Treasurer has full powers as a fiduciary to hold, purchase, sell, assign, transfer, lend and dispose of any of the securities or investments in which any of the programs created pursuant to this section have been invested, and may reinvest the proceeds from the sale of those securities or investments and any other investable assets of the program.

The cost of administration, management, and operation of investment programs established pursuant to this section shall be apportioned equitably among the programs in such manner as may be prescribed by the State Treasurer, such costs to be paid from each program, and to the extent not otherwise chargeable directly to the income or assets of the specific investment program or pooled investment vehicle, shall be deposited with the State Treasurer as a General Fund nontax revenue. The cost of administration, management, and operation of investment programs established pursuant to this section and not directly paid from the income or assets of such program shall be covered by an appropriation to the State Treasurer for this purpose in the Current Operations Appropriations Act.

The State Treasurer is authorized to retain the services of independent appraisers, auditors, actuaries, attorneys, investment counseling firms, statisticians, custodians, or other persons or firms possessing specialized skills or knowledge necessary for the proper administration of investment programs created pursuant to this section.

, (i) Repealed by Session Laws 2016-55, s. 2.1, effective January 31, 2017.

(i1)

The State Treasurer shall report the incentive bonus paid to the Chief Investment Officer to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations by October 1 of each year.

(i2)

In order to promote achievement of long-term investment objectives and to retain key public employees with investment functions, the State Treasurer is authorized to establish, consistent with the State Treasurer’s fiduciary duties, market-oriented compensation plans, including salaries and performance-related bonuses, for employees possessing specialized skills or knowledge necessary for the proper administration of investment programs, who shall be exempt from the classification and compensation rules established by the Office of State Human Resources. The design and administration of those compensation plans shall be based on compensation studies conducted by a nationally recognized firm specializing in public fund investment compensation. The compensation and other associated employee benefits shall be apportioned directly from the investment program. The Treasurer shall report the salaries and bonuses paid to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General Government annually.

(i3)

The Treasurer may invest in the countries of Sudan and South Sudan to the extent not prohibited by the United States Government, or to the extent that such investment is part of an index or index replication strategy, a commingled fund, limited partnership, or similar investment vehicle, or a derivative instrument.

(j)

Subject to the provisions of G.S. 147-69.1(d), the State Treasurer shall adopt any rules necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

History.

1979, c. 467, s. 3; 1981, c. 445, ss. 4, 5; 1983, c. 515, s. 1; c. 702, s. 10; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, ss. 116, 117; 1987, c. 751, ss. 6-8; 2001-444, s. 4; 2002-126, s. 6.12; 2005-276, s. 27.3; 2006-203, s. 119; 2008-132, s. 5; 2014-100, s. 33.2(a); 2016-55, s. 2.1; 2021-58, s. 1(a).

Cross References.

As to investment of idle cash by community colleges, see

G.S. 115D-58.6

.

§ 147-69.3A.
Liability insurance for State Treasurer.

The State Treasurer may purchase commercial insurance of any kind to cover all risks or potential liability of the State Treasurer, boards in the Department of the State Treasurer, members of boards in the Department of the State Treasurer, and employees and agents of the State Treasurer, including the risks and potential liability related to investments managed by the State Treasurer.

Board members and employees of boards in the Department of the State Treasurer shall be considered State employees for purposes of Articles 31 and 31A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes. To the extent that the State Treasurer purchases commercial liability insurance coverage in excess of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) per claim for liability arising under Article 31 or 31A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, the provisions of

G.S. 143-299.4

shall not apply. To the extent that the State Treasurer purchases commercial insurance coverage for liability arising under Article 31 or 31A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, the provisions of

G.S. 143-300.6(a)

shall not apply.

The purchase of insurance by the State Treasurer under this section shall not be construed to waive sovereign immunity or any other defense available to the State Treasurer, boards in the Department of the State Treasurer, members of boards in the Department of the State Treasurer, or employees or agents of the State Treasurer in an action or contested matter in any court, agency, or tribunal. The purchase of insurance by the State Treasurer shall not be construed to alter or expand the limitations on claims or payments established in

G.S. 143-299.2

or limit the right of the State Treasurer, board members, employees, or agents to defense by the State as provided by

G.S. 143-300.3

.

History.

2011-300, s. 1.

§ 147-69.4.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2010-175, s. 5, effective July 1, 2010.

History.

2007-384, s. 1; repealed by 2010-175, s. 5, effective July 1, 2010.

§ 147-69.5.
Local Government Law Enforcement Special Separation Allowance Fund.

The Local Government Law Enforcement Special Separation Allowance Fund is established as a fund in the Office of the State Treasurer under the management of the Treasurer. The Fund consists of contributions made by entities authorized to make contributions to the Fund and interest and other investment income earned by the Fund. Contributions to the Fund are irrevocable. Assets of the Fund may be used only to provide law enforcement special separation allowance benefits to individuals who are former employees of a unit of local government that contributes to the Fund and are entitled to law enforcement special separation allowance payable by the unit. The assets of the Fund are not subject to the claims of creditors of an entity that contributes to the Fund.

History.

2007-384, s. 6.